Maryland, session 2026, SB0187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–301.
(A) (1) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE, “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS A AN INCARCERATED
WOMAN WHO:
(I) (1) IS WITHIN 18 36 MONTHS OF THE WOMAN’S
ANTICIPATED RELEASE DATE; AND
(II) (2) HAS PRERELEASE OR MINIMUM SECURITY STATUS.
(3) “REENTRY FACILITY” MEANS A COMMUNITY–BASED FACILITY OR
ANY OTHER FACILITY OPERATED BY THE COMMISSIONER FOR ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUALS.
3–301. 3–302.
(a) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commissioner shall operate a
comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease prerelease unit REENTRY FACILITY for women
ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS that:
(1) is a separate structure in which the services specified in § 3–303(b)
3–304(B) 3–305 of this subtitle are provided;
(2) has security features for female incarcerated individuals who:
(i) present the least risk of violence;
(ii) present the least risk of escape; and
(iii) have a record of satisfactory institutional behavior; and
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 876
(3) matches security level on a validated gender–responsive risk measure
IS ARCHITECTURALLY DESIGNED AND CONSTRUCTED TO FACILITATE THE
PROVISION OF SERVICES SPECIFIED IN § 3–304(B) 3–305 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) INCLUDES:
(I) FEATURES THAT:
1. BALANCE PHYSICAL SAFETY AND SECURITY WITH
VISUAL PRIVACY AND DIGNITY; AND
2. ENCOURAGE REHABILITATION BY PROVIDING AS
CLOSE TO A NONCARCERAL ENVIRONMENT AS PRACTICABLE;
(II) HOUSING UNITS WITH DOUBLE AND SINGLE OCCUPANCY;
(III) HANDICAPPED ACCESSIBLE ROOMS, WHEELCHAIR RAMPS,
AND DESIGNATED HANDICAPPED PARKING SPACES;
(IV) BATHROOMS THAT MAXIMIZE PRIVACY, DIGNITY, AND
SECURITY OF RESIDENTS, STAFF, AND VISITORS;
(V) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES;
(VI) INDOOR AND OUTDOOR MEETING, LOUNGE, AND VISITING
SPACES, INCLUDING FAMILY VISITING SPACES;
(VII) A CLASSROOM CLASSROOMS;
(VIII) A CAREER CENTER;
(IX) A NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL SUITE;
(X) ON–SITE RECREATIONAL, CREATIVE, AND ATHLETIC
FACILITIES; AND
(XI) ACCESS TO PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION.
(b) [(1) In determining where to place a prerelease unit for women, the
Commissioner shall determine into which area, defined by zip codes, the largest percentage
of incarcerated individuals will likely be released.
(2)] A prerelease prerelease unit REENTRY FACILITY for women shall be:
– 3 –

Ch. 876 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) located in [or adjacent to the zip codes identified in paragraph (1) of this
subsection] BALTIMORE CITY THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WHERE THE LARGEST
NUMBER OF FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS WILL LIKELY BE RELEASED,
REASONABLY CLOSE TO THE COMMUNITIES TO WHICH THOSE INDIVIDUALS WILL
RETURN; AND BALTIMORE CITY ON A SITE THAT IS:
(I) NOT LESS THAN 3 ACRES IN LAND AREA; AND
(II) NOT LOCATED WITHIN ONE–HALF MILE OF ANY EXISTING
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; AND ON A SITE THAT IS:
(I) NOT LESS THAN 3 ACRES IN LAND AREA; AND
(II) NOT LOCATED WITHIN A 1–MILE RADIUS OF ANY EXISTING
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY; AND
(2) ABLE TO ACCOMMODATE THE ADMINISTRATION, HOUSING,
PROGRAMMING, AND SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE FOR NOT FEWER
THAN 1.25 TIMES THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF WOMEN AT THE MARYLAND
CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN WHO WERE ELIGIBLE FOR PRERELEASE
STATUS IN CALENDAR YEAR 2024, 2023, AS REPORTED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ITS
OCTOBER 2024 REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND
THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE.
(c) An incarcerated individual assigned to a prerelease prerelease unit REENTRY
FACILITY for women may have access to the community for any purpose described in §
3–305(a) 3–306(A) 3–307(A) of this subtitle.
(d) The Department shall:
(1) identify a location, acquire property, and design a site plan for the
prerelease prerelease unit REENTRY FACILITY for women on or before June 1, 2021
OCTOBER 1, 2027, OR NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER;
(2) begin construction or renovation of the facility on or before September
1, 2021; and JULY 1, 2028, OR NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER;
(3) COMPLETE THE CONSTRUCTION OR RENOVATION ON OR BEFORE
MARCH 1, 2031, OR NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER; AND
(4) begin operating and providing services in the facility on or before June
1, 2023 SEPTEMBER 1, 2031, OR NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS THEREAFTER.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 876
3–301.1. 3–303.
(A) ON REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE THE DEPARTMENT OF
GENERAL SERVICES SHALL:
(1) REVIEW AND EVALUATE ANY PROPOSALS CURRENTLY IN
POSSESSION OF THE DEPARTMENT FOR COMPLIANCE WITH THE FACILITY
REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE BY JUNE 1, 2026;
(2) IF NO CURRENT PROPOSAL EVALUATED UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
SUBJECT TO ITEM (2) OF THIS SECTION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE EXPEDITED
PROCUREMENT PROCESS UNDER § 13–108 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE, ISSUE A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS FOR THE PLANNING,
DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF A PRERELEASE UNIT REENTRY FACILITY FOR
WOMEN, AS REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 3–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE, BY AUGUST JUNE
1, 2026; AND
(2) PRIOR TO ISSUING THE REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS UNDER ITEM
(1) OF THIS SECTION, SUBMIT A TIMELINE OF DELIVERABLES FOR THE PLANNING,
DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF THE REENTRY PRERELEASE FACILITY FOR WOMEN
TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE OFFICE OF THE CORRECTIONAL
OMBUDSMAN.
(3) REVIEW AND EVALUATE PROPOSALS IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) AWARD A CONTRACT TO A PROVIDER AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE.
(B) A REQUEST FOR PROPOSALS ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION SHALL ACCURATELY AND COMPLETELY DESCRIBE, TO THE EXTENT
PRACTICABLE, THE LOCATION, USES, AND TIMELINE FOR DELIVERABLES TOWARD
COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT.
(C) THE CONTRACT AWARDED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(4) OF THIS SECTION
TO BUILD A PRERELEASE UNIT FOR FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS SHALL:
(1) COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IN § 3–301 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(2) INCLUDE:
(I) HOUSING UNITS WITH DOUBLE AND SINGLE OCCUPANCY;
– 5 –

Ch. 876 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) HANDICAPPED ACCESSIBLE ROOMS, WHEELCHAIR RAMPS,
AND DESIGNATED HANDICAPPED PARKING SPACES;
(III) BATHROOMS THAT MAXIMIZE PRIVACY, DIGNITY, AND
SECURITY OF RESIDENTS, STAFF, AND VISITORS;
(IV) ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICES;
(V) INDOOR AND OUTDOOR MEETING, LOUNGE, AND VISITING
SPACES;
(VI) A CLASSROOM;
(VII) A CAREER CENTER;
(VIII) A NONEMERGENCY MEDICAL SUITE;
(IX) ON–SITE RECREATIONAL, CREATIVE, AND ATHLETIC
FACILITIES; AND
(X) ACCESS TO PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION.
[3–302.] 3–304.
The Commissioner has the same powers and duties relating to a prerelease
[prerelease unit] REENTRY FACILITY for women as the Commissioner has for any other
correctional facility in the Division.
3–303. 3–305.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUAL” MEANS AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL
WITH PRERELEASE STATUS AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR
WOMEN.
(3) (2) “Evidence–based programs and practices” has the meaning
stated in § 6–119 of this article.
(4) (3) “GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES” MEANS
EVIDENCE–BASED PROGRAMS AND PRACTICES THAT RECOGNIZE ADDRESS THE
SPECIFIC NEEDS OF INCARCERATED WOMEN IN PRERELEASE STATUS ELIGIBLE
INDIVIDUALS REGARDING THEIR THERAPEUTIC, EDUCATIONAL, AND VOCATIONAL
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 876
GOALS, LIFE SKILLS, PSYCHOLOGICAL DEVELOPMENT, SOCIALIZATION, CULTURE,
EXPOSURE TO TRAUMA, AND LIFE EXPERIENCES, TO REDUCE CRIMINOGENIC RISKS
AND SUPPORT SUCCESSFUL REENTRY, RECOVERY, AND RECIDIVISM REDUCTION.
[(3)] (5) (4) “Innovative programs and practices” has the meaning stated in §
6–119 of this article.
(b) (1) The Commissioner shall make evidence–based, TRAUMA–INFORMED,
and gender–responsive services available to female incarcerated ELIGIBLE individuals [at
the prerelease unit FACILITY for women required under § 3–301 3–302 of this subtitle]
WITH PRERELEASE STATUS.
(2) THE SERVICES REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
PROVIDED TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS BEFORE THE FINAL CONSTRUCTION AND
OCCUPATION OF THE FACILITY REQUIRED UNDER § 3–301 3–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) The comprehensive rehabilitative prerelease prerelease REENTRY services
shall utilize evidence–based, TRAUMA–INFORMED, AND GENDER–RESPONSIVE
programs and practices and innovative programs and practices to:
(1) assist female incarcerated individuals in improving their education,
upgrading vocational skills, and obtaining suitable employment through classes to earn
industry certification or community college credits, workforce training, and job placement;
(2) provide female incarcerated individuals with the opportunity to
strengthen family and community relationships through extended family leave, parenting
workshops, and family reunification assistance;
(3) provide integrative and gender–responsive services, including medical
treatment, trauma–informed counseling, mental health treatment, and substance use
disorder treatment to address overall health and trauma needs and help female
incarcerated individuals achieve stable and productive roles in society; and
(4) develop individualized and comprehensive reentry plans involving
community provider partnerships for female incarcerated individuals to reduce barriers to
obtaining housing, jobs, education, health care, childcare and child welfare, transportation,
legal advocacy, case management, and other needs; AND
(5) SCREEN FEMALE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS FOR ELIGIBILITY
FOR PUBLIC BENEFITS AND PROVIDE RELEVANT APPLICATIONS AND ASSISTANCE
COMPLETING EACH APPLICATION PRIOR TO RELEASE AS PART OF A REENTRY PLAN.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A PLAN TO PROVIDE
COMPREHENSIVE GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES TO ELIGIBLE INDIVIDUALS
– 7 –

Ch. 876 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ON–SITE AT THE MARYLAND CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION FOR WOMEN ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2026.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CONTRACT WITH ANOTHER ENTITY TO
PROVIDE COMPREHENSIVE GENDER–RESPONSIVE SERVICES.
(E) INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS ASSIGNED TO THE FACILITY REQUIRED
UNDER § 3–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE TRANSPORTED TO ANOTHER
FACILITY TO RECEIVE COMPREHENSIVE REHABILITATIVE REENTRY PRERELEASE
SERVICES.
[3–304.] 3–306.
[(a)] By contract or purchase of service agreement, the Division may arrange for a
person or governmental unit to provide comprehensive rehabilitative [prerelease]
REENTRY services [in a prerelease unit FACILITY for women].
[(b) With the Secretary’s approval, the Commissioner may contract with a person
or a municipal or county authority to provide food, housing, transportation, and programs
to incarcerated individuals in a prerelease unit FACILITY for women.
(c) Under a contract with the federal government, the Commissioner may house
federal incarcerated individuals in a prerelease unit for women.]
[3–305.] 3–307.
(a) Subject to regulations adopted by the Commissioner, the Commissioner may
delegate to the facility administrator of a prerelease [prerelease unit] REENTRY FACILITY
for women the authority to grant incarcerated individuals the privilege of leaving the
confines of the [unit] FACILITY for the purpose of:
(1) engaging in or seeking employment;
(2) participating in educational programs or vocational training;
(3) participating in community or civic activities;
(4) participating in volunteer work;
(5) participating in athletic competition; or
(6) making personal or family visits.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 876
(b) When outside the confines of a prerelease [prerelease unit] REENTRY
FACILITY for women, an incarcerated individual shall carry, at all times, a copy of the form
signed by the facility administrator containing the conditions governing the grant of leave.
(c) (1) An incarcerated individual who is on leave is deemed to be in the
custody of the Commissioner to the same extent and subject to the same supervision and
control as an incarcerated individual who is actually in confinement.
(2) An incarcerated individual who escapes while on leave under this
section is subject to the penalties in § 9–404 of the Criminal Law Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before May 1, 2026, the
Maryland Department of Labor and the Department of Public Safety and Correctional
Services shall jointly submit a report to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee, the
Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House Judiciary Committee, and the House
Appropriations Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article,
on the status of reentry services in the State, including:
(1) the Maryland Reentry Initiative;
(2) workforce development programs and adult learning programs;
(3) reentry navigators;
(4) American Job Center services and programs;
(5) reentry and social work services; and
(6) reentry staffing and data collection for:
(i) case management and social work;
(ii) substance use peer recovery;
(iii) education; and
(iv) medical and mental health contractors.
SECTION 2. 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July June
1, 2026, December 15, 2026, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services
shall provide a preliminary report on the progress the Department has made to comply
with Section 1 of this Act, including any specific steps taken and dates on which specific
steps were taken to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee, the Senate Budget and
Taxation Committee, the House Judiciary Committee, and the House Appropriations
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
– 9 –

Ch. 876 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before September
July 1, 2026, May 1, 2027, the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services and
the Department of General Services shall provide an update on the progress of design and
construction of the prerelease unit reentry prerelease facility for women to the Senate
Judicial Proceedings Committee, the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the House
Judiciary Committee, and the House Appropriations Committee, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 4. 5. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before December Beginning June 1, 2026 On or before June 1 each year
beginning June 1, 2027, the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman established under Title
9, Subtitle 40 of the State Government Article shall review and verify the Department of
Public Safety and Correctional Services’ progress and submit a report, including findings
and recommendations, to the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee and the House
Judiciary Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article.
(b) The Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services shall fully
cooperate with the Office of the Correctional Ombudsman and provide all information, data,
and facility access requested to complete the review required under this section.
SECTION 5. 6. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Enacted under Article II, § 17(c) of the Maryland Constitution, May 31, 2026.
– 10 –